Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska19-4026
Hearing to create a district; call by petition.

In the event that the city council has not acted to call a hearing to create a district as provided in sections 19-4015 to 19-4038, it shall do so when presented with a petition signed by the record owners of thirty percent of the assessable front footage in a business area or by the users of thirty percent of space in a business area.

Laws 1979, LB 251, § 12;

Laws 1983, LB 22, § 6.